hfst/abbr-som-lex.txt
! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !

LEXICON Abbreviations
	ab ;
	# ;

LEXICON ab 
BBC+N+Prop+Fem:bbc ab_fem ;
BBC+N+Prop+Fem:BBC ab_fem ;

GMT+N:GMT FINAL ;
SGA+N+Prop:SGA FINAL ;
CSS+N+Prop:CSS FINAL ; 
TV+N:TV FINAL ;


LEXICON ab_fem
+Def+Sg+Abs+Prox:da FINAL ;
+Indef+Sg+Abs:0 FINAL ;
+Indef+Sg+Nom:0 FINAL ;
+Indef+Sg+Gen:0 FINAL ;
